Colorado, session 2026A, SB045.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Nuclear energy is a critical component of Colorado's clean
energy strategy and economic development, offering consistent, reliable,
and noncarbon power generation to support grid stability and emissions
reduction goals;
(b) A highly skilled workforce is essential for the deployment and
operation of nuclear technologies. Workforce readiness in engineering,
radiation safety, and reactor technology is necessary to support Colorado's
energy transition.
(c) The Colorado nuclear workforce development and education
council will harness private investment, federal funding, and strategic
partnerships to make the state a leader in nuclear energy workforce
development. Through grants to eligible institutions of higher education
and related technical assistance, the council will expand educational
-2- 045

pathways to careers in the nuclear energy sector.
(d) The Colorado school of mines' expertise in energy resource
management, workforce development, and federal grant facilitation
uniquely positions it to house the Colorado nuclear workforce
development and education council; and
(e) By developing and expanding existing state higher education
infrastructure, including degree and certificate programs and technical
training, and by leveraging public and private sector collaboration, the
Colorado nuclear workforce development and education council will help
Colorado expand workforce readiness in the nuclear energy sector
without new state appropriations, supporting long-term economic growth
and clean energy innovation.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 3 to article
41 of title 23 as follows:
PART 3
COLORADO NUCLEAR WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
EDUCATION COUNCIL
23-41-301. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 3, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "CASH FUND" MEANS THE COLORADO NUCLEAR WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT AND EDUCATION CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
23-41-306.
(2) "COAL TRANSITION COMMUNITY" MEANS A COAL TRANSITION
COMMUNITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 8-83-502.
(3) "COUNCIL" MEANS THE COLORADO NUCLEAR WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT AND EDUCATION COUNCIL CREATED IN SECTION 23-41-302.
-3- 045

(4) "ELIGIBLE INSTITUTION" MEANS A STATE INSTITUTION OF
HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-18-102 (10)(a); A LOCAL
DISTRICT COLLEGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-71-102; OR AN AREA
TECHNICAL COLLEGE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-60-103.
(5) "GRANT PROGRAM" MEANS THE COLORADO NUCLEAR
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAM CREATED
IN SECTION 23-41-304.
(6) "THIRD-PARTY ENTITY" MEANS AN ENTITY THAT HAS ENTERED
INTO A CONTRACT WITH THE COUNCIL TO PROVIDE STAFFING OR
OPERATIONAL SERVICES TO THE COUNCIL OR TO HELP IMPLEMENT THIS
PART 3, INCLUDING THE GRANT PROGRAM.
23-41-302. Colorado nuclear workforce development and
education council - created.
(1) THE COLORADO NUCLEAR WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
EDUCATION COUNCIL IS CREATED IN THE COLORADO SCHOOL OF MINES.
THE PURPOSE OF THE COUNCIL IS TO MEET GROWING WORKFORCE DEMAND
IN THE NUCLEAR ENERGY SECTOR BY:
(a) PROVIDING GRANTS THROUGH THE GRANT PROGRAM TO
ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OR EXPANSION OF DEGREE
PROGRAMS, CERTIFICATE PROGRAMS, INDIVIDUAL COURSES, OR MODULAR
TRAINING FOCUSED ON NUCLEAR ENERGY; AND
(b) PROVIDING ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS WITH RELATED TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE.
(2) THE COUNCIL IS ONLY REQUIRED TO IMPLEMENT SECTIONS
23-41-303, 23-41-304, AND 23-41-305 IF, PURSUANT TO SECTION
23-41-307, SECTIONS 23-41-303, 23-41-304, AND 23-41-305 BECOME
EFFECTIVE.
-4- 045

(3) THE COUNCIL ACTIVITIES, INCLUDING PROVIDING TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE, ANY CONTRACTED WORK PERFORMED BY A THIRD-PARTY
ENTITY, THE GRANT PROGRAM, AND ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS MUST BE
FUNDED ENTIRELY BY GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. GIFTS, GRANTS,
AND DONATIONS MUST FUND THE COUNCIL'S WORK THROUGHOUT THE
COURSE OF THE COUNCIL'S WORK, AND GENERAL FUND MONEY SHALL NOT
BE APPROPRIATED FOR THE IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS PART 3.
(4) THE WORK OF THE COUNCIL OR ANY OTHER ENTITY PURSUANT
TO THIS PART 3 IS CONTINGENT ON MONEY BEING AVAILABLE TO
IMPLEMENT THIS PART 3. IF MONEY IS NOT AVAILABLE FOR THE COUNCIL
OR ANY OTHER ENTITY TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES REQUIRED BY THIS PART
3, THE COUNCIL OR ENTITY IS NOT REQUIRED TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES.
A CONTRACT WITH A THIRD-PARTY ENTITY OR ELIGIBLE INSTITUTION MUST
PROVIDE THAT THE CONTRACT IS CONTINGENT ON MONEY BEING
AVAILABLE FOR THE SPECIFIED PURPOSE AND THE MONEY BEING
AVAILABLE FOR THE DURATION OF THE CONTRACT.
(5) (a) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF MEMBERS APPOINTED BY THE
DESIGNATED APPOINTING AUTHORITIES AS FOLLOWS:
(I) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS OF
THE COUNCIL:
(A) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PRIVATE
COMPANY IN THE NUCLEAR OR CLEAN ENERGY SECTOR;
(B) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A COAL
TRANSITION COMMUNITY OR RURAL AREA OF THE STATE; AND
(C) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A PHYSICIST OR ENGINEER FROM A
FEDERAL LABORATORY AND WHO HAS AT LEAST FIVE YEARS OF
EXPERIENCE IN THE NUCLEAR SECTOR;
-5- 045

(II) THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, THE MINORITY LEADER OF THE
SENATE, THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES, AND THE
MINORITY LEADER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES SHALL EACH
APPOINT:
(A) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A PRIVATE
COMPANY IN THE NUCLEAR OR CLEAN ENERGY SECTOR; AND
(B) ONE MEMBER WHO IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A LABOR
ORGANIZATION, A REPRESENTATIVE OF A SMALL OR MID-SIZED NUCLEAR
SUPPLY CHAIN BUSINESS, AN ENVIRONMENTAL SAFETY EXPERT, OR A
WORKFORCE TRAINING PROFESSIONAL; AND
(III) THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL
APPOINT ONE MEMBER WHO IS A MEMBER OF THE COLORADO COMMISSION
ON HIGHER EDUCATION.
(b) A MEMBER OF THE COUNCIL MUST BE A COLORADO RESIDENT
UNLESS THE MEMBER IS APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a)(I)(C)
OF THIS SECTION OR IS A REPRESENTATIVE OF A SMALL OR MID-SIZED
NUCLEAR SUPPLY CHAIN BUSINESS OR AN ENVIRONMENTAL SAFETY
EXPERT APPOINTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (5)(a)(II)(B) OF THIS
SECTION.
(c) THE APPOINTING AUTHORITIES SHALL MAKE THE INITIAL
APPOINTMENTS TO THE COUNCIL AS SOON AS POSSIBLE AFTER THE
EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION BUT NO LATER THAN JANUARY 1, 2027.
(d) THE TERM OF APPOINTMENT IS FOUR YEARS; EXCEPT THAT THE
TERM OF EACH MEMBER INITIALLY APPOINTED IS TWO YEARS.
23-41-303. Colorado nuclear workforce development and
education council - meetings - duties - authority to contract.
(1) (a) THE COUNCIL SHALL ELECT A CHAIR FROM AMONG THE
-6- 045

COUNCIL'S MEMBERS TO SERVE FOR A TERM NOT TO EXCEED TWO YEARS,
AS DETERMINED BY THE COUNCIL.
(b) THE PRESIDENT OF THE COLORADO SCHOOL OF MINES SHALL
CONVENE THE FIRST MEETING OF THE COUNCIL NO LATER THAN
FORTY-TWO DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.
THEREAFTER, THE COUNCIL SHALL MEET AT LEAST QUARTERLY. THE
CHAIR MAY CALL ADDITIONAL MEETINGS AS ARE NECESSARY FOR THE
COUNCIL TO COMPLETE ITS DUTIES.
(2) MEMBERS OF THE COUNCIL SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION
BUT ARE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT FOR ACTUAL AND
NECESSARY EXPENSES INCURRED IN THE PERFORMANCE OF THE MEMBERS'
DUTIES ON THE COUNCIL.
(3) WITH STAFFING AND OPERATIONAL ASSISTANCE FROM A
THIRD-PARTY ENTITY, THE COUNCIL SHALL:
(a) CONVENE, AT A FREQUENCY TO BE DETERMINED BY THE
COUNCIL, ADVISORY SESSIONS WITH STAKEHOLDERS FROM THE NUCLEAR,
EDUCATIONAL, AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT SECTORS TO ASSESS AND
ADOPT STRATEGIES TO RESPOND TO EVOLVING WORKFORCE DEMANDS AND
OPPORTUNITIES IN THE NUCLEAR ENERGY SECTOR; AND
(b) IMPLEMENT THE GRANT PROGRAM, INCLUDING:
(I) REVIEWING AND APPROVING GRANT PROGRAM GUIDELINES AND
PROCEDURES TO ENSURE GRANTS ARE AWARDED THROUGH AN OPEN,
COMPETITIVE PROCESS USING NATIONAL BEST PRACTICES;
(II) REVIEWING APPLICATIONS FROM ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS;
(III) SELECTING GRANT RECIPIENTS AND DETERMINING GRANT
AWARD AMOUNTS;
(IV) PROVIDING ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS WITH TECHNICAL
-7- 045

ASSISTANCE; AND
(V) EVALUATING THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(4) THE COUNCIL MAY PROMOTE NUCLEAR ENERGY EDUCATION
AND RESEARCH ACTIVITIES AMONG ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS TO ENHANCE
THE ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS' ABILITY TO ATTRACT FEDERAL AND PRIVATE
SECTOR FUNDING FOR NUCLEAR ENERGY EDUCATION, TRAINING, AND
RELATED RESEARCH.
(5) THE COUNCIL SHALL DEVELOP GUIDELINES AND PROCEDURES
AS NECESSARY TO IMPLEMENT THIS PART 3.
(6) THE COUNCIL SHALL CONTRACT WITH ONE OR MORE
THIRD-PARTY ENTITIES TO PROVIDE STAFFING AND OPERATIONAL
ASSISTANCE TO THE COUNCIL OR TO HELP IMPLEMENT OTHER PROVISIONS
OF THIS PART 3.
(7) THE COUNCIL MUST USE A REQUEST FOR PROPOSAL PROCESS TO
DESIGNATE AND CONTRACT WITH A THIRD-PARTY ENTITY FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3. A THIRD-PARTY ENTITY MAY PROVIDE IN-KIND
STAFF SUPPORT OR TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE TO ASSIST THE COUNCIL IN
PERFORMING THE COUNCIL'S DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES. THIRD-PARTY
ENTITY PERSONNEL ARE NOT EMPLOYEES OF THE COUNCIL OR THE STATE.
(8) THE COUNCIL MAY USE UP TO TEN PERCENT OF THE MONEY IN
THE CASH FUND TO PAY DIRECT AND INDIRECT ADMINISTRATIVE COSTS.
23-41-304. Colorado nuclear workforce development and
education grant program - created - application - criteria - awards.
(1) THE COLORADO NUCLEAR WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
EDUCATION GRANT PROGRAM IS CREATED IN THE COLORADO SCHOOL OF
MINES TO MEET GROWING WORKFORCE DEMAND IN THE NUCLEAR ENERGY
SECTOR BY PROVIDING GRANTS TO ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS FOR THE
-8- 045

DEVELOPMENT OR EXPANSION OF NUCLEAR ENERGY DEGREE PROGRAMS,
CERTIFICATE PROGRAMS, INDIVIDUAL COURSES, OR MODULAR TRAINING.
(2) THE COUNCIL SHALL BEGIN AWARDING GRANTS ONLY AFTER
THE BALANCE OF THE CASH FUND REACHES OR EXCEEDS FIVE HUNDRED
THOUSAND DOLLARS. THE COUNCIL SHALL EXPLORE OPPORTUNITIES TO
LEVERAGE FEDERAL FUNDING, INCLUDING FEDERAL WORKFORCE
DEVELOPMENT MATCHING GRANTS.
(3) GRANT RECIPIENTS MAY USE THE MONEY RECEIVED THROUGH
THE GRANT PROGRAM FOR THE DESIGN OF COURSES OR DEGREE
PROGRAMS, CERTIFICATE PROGRAMS, OR TRAINING PROGRAMS FOCUSED
ON NUCLEAR ENERGY; FOR PERSONNEL; OR FOR ADMINISTRATIVE OR
FACILITY EXPENSES NECESSARY TO DEVELOP OR EXPAND NUCLEAR
ENERGY DEGREE, CERTIFICATE, TRAINING, OR COURSE OFFERINGS.
(4) THE COUNCIL, WITH ASSISTANCE FROM AND IN COORDINATION
WITH A THIRD-PARTY ENTITY, SUBJECT TO THE AVAILABILITY OF MONEY
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL ADMINISTER THE
GRANT PROGRAM AND SHALL AWARD GRANTS AS PROVIDED IN THIS PART
3. GRANTS MUST BE PAID OUT OF THE CASH FUND.
(5) TO RECEIVE A GRANT, AN ELIGIBLE INSTITUTION MUST SUBMIT
AN APPLICATION TO THE COUNCIL IN ACCORDANCE WITH GUIDELINES AND
PROCEDURES ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION 23-41-303 (5).
(6) (a) THE COUNCIL SHALL REVIEW THE APPLICATIONS RECEIVED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION. IN SELECTING GRANT RECIPIENTS, THE
COUNCIL SHALL PRIORITIZE ELIGIBLE INSTITUTIONS THAT CAN PROVIDE A
TRAINED WORKFORCE EXPEDITIOUSLY. IN ADDITION TO OTHER RELEVANT
FACTORS, THE COUNCIL SHALL CONSIDER THE FOLLOWING CRITERIA WHEN
AWARDING GRANTS:
-9- 045

(I) THE DISTRIBUTION OF NUCLEAR ENERGY DEGREE PROGRAMS,
CERTIFICATE PROGRAMS, INDIVIDUAL COURSES, AND MODULAR TRAINING
OPPORTUNITIES OFFERED ACROSS THE STATE;
(II) THE NEED FOR A NUCLEAR ENERGY WORKFORCE IN THE
APPLICANT'S SURROUNDING COMMUNITY OR REGION OF THE STATE;
(III) THE PROJECTED STUDENT INTEREST IN THE NUCLEAR ENERGY
DEGREE PROGRAMS, CERTIFICATE PROGRAMS, INDIVIDUAL COURSES, AND
MODULAR TRAINING OPPORTUNITIES AT COMPETING INSTITUTIONS; AND
(IV) THE EXTENT TO WHICH THE APPLICANT'S PROPOSED NUCLEAR
ENERGY DEGREE PROGRAM, CERTIFICATE PROGRAM, COURSE WORK, OR
MODULAR TRAINING INCLUDES A FOCUS ON NUCLEAR REGULATION AND
COVERS THE ENTIRE NUCLEAR FUEL CYCLE.
(b) TO AWARD A GRANT, AT LEAST A MAJORITY OF THE MEMBERS
OF THE COUNCIL MUST APPROVE THE GRANT.
23-41-305. Reporting requirements.
(1) ON OR BEFORE THE FIRST NOVEMBER 1 AFTER THE EFFECTIVE
DATE OF THIS SECTION, AND ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 EACH YEAR
THEREAFTER UNTIL THE REPEAL OF THIS PART 3, THE COUNCIL SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE COLORADO COMMISSION ON HIGHER
EDUCATION, THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT
COMMITTEE, THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES EDUCATION COMMITTEE,
THE SENATE TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE, AND THE SENATE
EDUCATION COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES. AT A
MINIMUM, THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE:
(a) A SUMMARY OF THE GRANT PROGRAM AND ITS
IMPLEMENTATION AND ANY RELATED TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE PROVIDED
TO GRANT RECIPIENTS; AND
-10- 045

(b) AN ACCOUNTING OF THE SOURCE AND AMOUNT OF MONEY
CREDITED TO THE CASH FUND AND HOW CASH FUND MONEY WAS USED
PURSUANT TO THIS PART 3, INCLUDING GRANT PROGRAM AWARDS TO
EXPAND OR SUPPORT NUCLEAR ENERGY DEGREE PROGRAMS, CERTIFICATE
PROGRAMS, INDIVIDUAL COURSES, AND MODULAR TRAINING
OPPORTUNITIES IN ORDER TO MEET GROWING WORKFORCE DEMAND IN THE
NUCLEAR ENERGY SECTOR.
23-41-306. Colorado nuclear workforce development and
education cash fund - created.
(1) THE COLORADO NUCLEAR WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
EDUCATION CASH FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE CASH
FUND CONSISTS OF GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS CREDITED TO THE
CASH FUND PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COUNCIL MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS, GRANTS,
OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE PURPOSES OF
THIS PART 3. THE COUNCIL SHALL TRANSMIT ALL MONEY RECEIVED
THROUGH GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO
SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY TO THE CASH FUND.
(3) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL INTEREST AND
INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF MONEY IN THE
CASH FUND TO THE CASH FUND.
(4) MONEY IN THE CASH FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED
TO THE BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE COLORADO SCHOOL OF MINES FOR THE
PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN THIS PART 3.
(5) THE COUNCIL MAY ACCEPT DONATIONS OF IN-KIND SERVICES
FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3, INCLUDING FOR TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE.
-11- 045

(6) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL NOT APPROPRIATE GENERAL
FUND MONEY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3.
(7) (a) IF, ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, THE MONEY IN THE
CASH FUND HAS NEVER REACHED OR EXCEEDED FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND
DOLLARS, THE STATE TREASURER SHALL RETURN FROM THE CASH FUND TO
THE GRANTOR OR DONOR THE AMOUNT OF THE GRANTOR'S OR DONOR'S
GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS AND, NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2)
OF THIS SECTION, THE COUNCIL SHALL NOT ACCEPT ADDITIONAL GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3.
(b) IF ANY MONEY REMAINS IN THE CASH FUND AFTER THE STATE
TREASURER RETURNS MONEY TO DONORS OR GRANTORS PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (7)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AS APPLICABLE, THE STATE
TREASURER SHALL, PRIOR TO THE REPEAL OF THE CASH FUND, TRANSFER
ALL UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY IN THE CASH FUND TO THE
GENERAL FUND.
23-41-307. Effective date - repeal of part - review of functions.
(1) SECTIONS 23-41-303, 23-41-304, AND 23-41-305 TAKE EFFECT
IF THE COUNCIL RECEIVES, ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1, 2027, AT LEAST
FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND DOLLARS OF GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FOR
THE PURPOSES OF THIS PART 3. THE PRESIDENT OF THE COLORADO SCHOOL
OF MINES SHALL NOTIFY THE REVISOR OF STATUTES IN WRITING OF THE
DATE ON WHICH THE CONDITION SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION (1) HAS
O C C U R R E D B Y E M A I L I N G T H E N O T I C E T O
REVISOROFSTATUTES.GA@COLEG.GOV. SECTIONS 23-41-303, 23-41-304,
AND 23-41-305 TAKE EFFECT UPON THE DATE IDENTIFIED IN THE NOTICE
THAT THE COUNCIL HAS RECEIVED AT LEAST FIVE HUNDRED THOUSAND
DOLLARS OF GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS
-12- 045

PART 3 OR, IF THE NOTICE DOES NOT SPECIFY THAT DATE, UPON THE DATE
OF THE NOTICE TO THE REVISOR OF STATUTES.
(2) THIS PART 3 AND SECTION 24-34-104 (34)(a)(XIV) ARE
REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 30, 2027; EXCEPT THAT, IF THE
CONDITION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION OCCURS:
(a) SECTION 24-34-104 (34)(a)(XIV) IS NOT REPEALED PURSUANT
TO THIS SUBSECTION (2);
(b) THIS PART 3 IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1, 2033; AND
(c) BEFORE THE REPEAL PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, THIS PART 3 IS SCHEDULED FOR REVIEW IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 24-34-104.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, add
(34)(a)(XIV) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies
and functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(34) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2033:
(XIV) THE COLORADO NUCLEAR WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT AND
EDUCATION COUNCIL CREATED IN PART 3 OF ARTICLE 41 OF TITLE 23.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
-13- 045

unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-14- 045